Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1
LOCAL COORDINATING ORGANIZATIONS

26.5-2-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Local entities are best positioned to understand the varying needs for early childhood programs and services that arise in the widely diverse communities throughout the state; and

Each community requires leadership by local entities that, alone or in partnership with the state, can coordinate the resources available within the community with state resources to provide the type and level of early childhood and family support programs and services each community requires.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that, to best serve the families and children in all communities throughout the state, the department shall select and work with local coordinating organizations in communities throughout the state to support access to and equitable delivery of early childhood and family support programs and services, identify gaps in service, foster partnerships, create alignment among the public and private providers and agencies within the community that serve families and children, and establish a comprehensive, locally supported plan for providing early childhood and family support programs and services equitably within the community.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 583, § 3, effective April 25.

26.5-2-102. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado universal preschool program" or "state preschool program" means the Colorado universal preschool program created in part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5.

"Coordinator agreement" means the agreement that the department enters into with a local coordinating organization as described in section 26.5-2-105.

"Head start agency" means the local public or private nonprofit agency designated by the federal department of health and human services to operate a head start program under the provisions of Title V of the federal "Economic Opportunity Act of 1964", as amended.

"Local and tribal agencies" means county departments of human or social services and agencies of an Indian tribe that have responsibility for funding for early childhood and family support programs and services, school districts, charter schools that participate in the state preschool program, and head start agencies.

"Local coordinating organization" means an entity selected by the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-103 to support access to and equitable delivery of early childhood and family support programs and services in specified communities throughout the state.

"Mixed delivery system" has the same meaning as provided in section 26.5-4-203.

"Preschool provider" has the same meaning as provided in section 26.5-4-203.

"Preschool services" means preschool services provided through the state preschool program in the school year preceding kindergarten eligibility to children who are four or five years of age and preschool services provided through the state preschool program to a limited number of children who are three years of age or younger.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 583, § 3, effective April 25.

26.5-2-103. Local coordinating organization - applications - selection - rules.

The department shall solicit applications from local public entities and Colorado-based nonprofit organizations to serve as local coordinating organizations in communities throughout the state. Entities that may submit applications include, but are not limited to, county or municipal government agencies, school districts, boards of cooperative services, early childhood councils, family resource centers, special taxing districts, head start grantees, local nonprofit organizations, charter school networks and collaboratives, and other public institutions. Entities may apply singly or in partnership with other entities within the community. The solicitation and selection of entities to serve as local coordinating organizations are not subject to the requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

An entity that seeks to serve as a local coordinating organization must apply to the department in accordance with department rules, if any, procedures, and timelines. At a minimum, the application must include:

The proposed boundaries of the community within which the applicant would serve as the local coordinating organization for early childhood and family support programs and services provided to children and families within the community. The department may require, and shall work with the applicant to ensure, that the applicant's proposed boundaries align with one or more areas that the department identifies as a community. In identifying communities and establishing community boundaries throughout the state, the department shall ensure that a school district is not included in more than one community without the prior approval of the school district board of education expressed in an approved board resolution.

Evidence that the applicant has the support of the local early childhood community in applying to serve as the local coordinating organization, which must include the support of families, providers, early childhood councils, local and tribal agencies, school districts, charter schools, and local governments within the community;

The applicant's plan to coordinate with, at a minimum, the following entities within the proposed community:

Administrative units, as defined in section 22-20-103, which remain responsible for overseeing implementation of the part B component of the federal "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended;

Early childhood councils;

Head start agencies;

Family resource centers, as defined in section 26.5-3-102; and

County departments of human and social services in providing child care services through the Colorado child care assistance program established in part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5 and other family support programs and services;

The applicant's proposed operating model for meeting the duties and responsibilities of a local coordinating organization, including, at a minimum, the applicant's personnel capacity and a proposed budget that reflects the anticipated operating and overhead costs and sources of funding; and

If the applicant is a preschool provider, the applicant's plan for ensuring that serving as the local coordinating organization does not result in an unfair advantage to the applicant with regard to allocations of preschool funding generally or in coordinating with the other preschool providers in the community to ensure the availability of a mixed delivery system and the allocation of funding among preschool providers based on parent choice.

An applicant may include in the application a proposal for shared responsibility with the department for distributing and administering public funding within the community, in which case the applicant must include in the application the applicant's history of and experience with distributing and administering public funding.

The department, in accordance with department rules, if any, and procedures, shall review each application received pursuant to this section and select local coordinating organizations for communities throughout the state, ensuring that, to the extent possible, every family in the state resides within a community for which a local coordinating organization is selected. In selecting local coordinating organizations from among the applications received, the department shall, at a minimum, evaluate:

The applicant's capacity to support families in applying for applicable early childhood and family support programs and services;

The applicant's capacity to equitably recruit preschool providers to participate in the Colorado universal preschool program and provide preschool services through a mixed delivery system that, to the fullest extent practicable, accommodates parent choice;

The demonstrated level of support for the applicant within the local early childhood community, the feasibility and quality of the applicant's plan to coordinate with other entities within the proposed community, and the applicant's history, if any, of coordinating with those entities; and

The quality and efficiency of the applicant's proposed operating model and the likelihood that the applicant will have the capacity, experience, and support to successfully fulfill the responsibilities and duties of a local coordinating organization.

The executive director may promulgate rules and the department shall adopt procedures and timelines as necessary to implement this part 1, including adopting a process for receiving and reviewing applications that results in the initial selection of local coordinating organizations as soon as practicable after April 25, 2022. The department shall enter into a coordinator agreement with each local coordinating organization in accordance with section 26.5-2-105. Before the termination or conclusion of a coordinator agreement, the department shall solicit applications for a local coordinating organization for the affected community pursuant to this section and may re-select the same entity to serve as a local coordinating organization.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 584, § 3, effective April 25.

26.5-2-104. Local coordinating organization - community plan - duties.

Each local coordinating organization shall adopt a community plan that fosters equitable access for families to, and robust participation by providers in, early childhood and family support programs and services by increasing access to, coordinating, and allocating funding for said programs and services within the community. The community plan must, at a minimum, address:

The manner in which the local coordinating organization will assist families in applying for early childhood and family support programs and services and in enrolling children with early care and education providers;

The manner in which the local coordinating organization will coordinate with county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103, and tribal agencies:

To integrate outreach for early childhood and family support programs and services with other efforts to provide holistic services for families, including food, cash assistance, and health care; and

To facilitate access to family support programs and services in support of county child welfare services, including implementation of the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", as defined in section 26-5-101 (4.5);

The manner in which the local coordinating organization will recruit and work with providers to ensure that families' needs for school- and community-based preschool providers, child care, and other early childhood services within the community are met to the fullest extent possible;

The method by which the local coordinating organization will ensure that a mixed delivery system of school- and community-based preschool providers, based on parental choice, is available within the community, including identifying the existing school- and community-based preschool providers in the community and establishing goals and benchmarks for increasing the availability of preschool providers as necessary to be responsive to family preferences;

A plan for working with early care and education providers to increase recruitment and retention of individuals in the early care and education workforce and to increase compensation for those individuals, with the goal of providing a living wage;

A plan for coordinating the school- and community-based preschool providers that are available within the community with the other available early childhood and family support programs and services for children who enroll in the preschool providers and their families;

A plan for collaborating with other local coordinating organizations to provide families access to early childhood and family support programs and services delivered by providers in other communities;

A plan for the allocation of funding among school- and community-based preschool providers and other early care and education providers in the community, with the goal of maximizing the use of funding to meet community needs, including the need for full-day services;

If the local coordinating organization shares responsibility with the state for distributing public funding, the manner in which it will, in coordination with local and tribal agencies, ensure that, to the extent possible, the public funding available to families is combined and coordinated to seamlessly provide early childhood and family support programs and services;

The local coordinating organization's plan and strategies for identifying, soliciting, and securing, as feasible, additional local resources and funding to support early childhood and family support programs and services in the community; and

The manner in which the local coordinating organization, in accordance with department requirements, will ensure transparency within the community concerning the amount of money available for and used to support early childhood and family support programs and services from all sources, including local property tax and sales tax and the maintenance of effort for child care assistance provided by county departments of human and social services within the community.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(a) of this section, the initial community plan that a local coordinating organization creates may be limited to addressing participation in the Colorado universal preschool program and the needs for, access to, and allocation of funding for school- and community-based preschool providers. With subsequent revisions of the plan, the local coordinating organization shall address the provision and coordination of additional early childhood and family support programs and services in the community as provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section in collaboration with local and tribal agencies.

Each local coordinating organization shall submit the initial community plan to the department pursuant to department rules, if any, procedures, and timelines. The department shall review the community plan and may require changes before approving the community plan as provided in section 26.5-2-105.

Each local coordinating organization shall regularly review and revise the community plan to ensure the plan continues to accurately reflect the early childhood and family support programs and services within the community and is relevant and effective in meeting families' needs for early childhood and family support programs and services. In creating, reviewing, and revising the community plan, the local coordinating organization shall solicit and take into account input from families, providers, members of the early childhood and family support workforce, local early childhood councils, local and tribal agencies, local governments, and the business community within the community. The local coordinating organization shall resubmit the community plan to the department following each review. Revisions to the community plan are subject to approval by the department as provided in section 26.5-2-105.

Each local coordinating organization shall implement the community plan and shall:

Coordinate the program application and enrollment process for early childhood programs for both families and providers and across all participating entities within the community to facilitate the greatest practicable degree of family access to early childhood and family support programs;

Subject to the availability and enrollment capacity of preschool providers in the community, provide universal access, in alignment with family choice, to high-quality school- and community-based preschool providers within the community for children in the year before eligibility for kindergarten;

Manage a mixed delivery system of preschool providers;

Allocate, in coordination with local and tribal agencies, when applicable, local early childhood funding and state preschool program funding to public and private providers within the community, based on the community plan, and ensure, to the greatest extent possible, that children who, pursuant to department rules adopted in accordance with section 26.5-4-204 (4)(a), are in low-income families and meet qualifying factors are prioritized, as directed by the department, to receive early childhood and family support programs and services;

Support and ensure the availability of high-quality early childhood care and education for all children, including supporting access to training and support for members of the early childhood workforce;

Support early childhood caregivers who are exempt from licensing pursuant to part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 in accessing family resources and resources related to health and safety, early childhood development, and workforce development;

Increase over time the capacity of high-quality early child care and education programs within the community to better meet family and community needs;

Support public and private providers in recruiting, developing, and retaining within the community a quality early childhood workforce that is culturally and linguistically relevant to the community;

Work with providers in the community to ensure the collection and reporting to the department of key systems level data, as required by department rules, in a manner that minimizes duplication and the burden on families and providers and ensures compliance with all applicable privacy protections;

Work in coordination with local county departments, as defined in section 26.5-4-103, and tribal agencies and local community-based organizations to integrate outreach for early childhood and family support programs and services with other efforts to provide holistic services for families, including food, cash assistance, and health care;

Comply with department rules, if any, in implementing the community plan and the duties described in this section;

Comply with any statutory auditing requirements that apply to the local coordinating organization or, if the local coordinating organization is not otherwise required by statute to undergo an annual financial audit, contract for the performance of an annual financial audit of the operations of the local coordinating organization by an independent auditor; and

Comply with any other provisions included in the coordinator agreement entered into between the local coordinating organization and the department pursuant to section 26.5-2-105 (1)(b).

Each local coordinating organization shall work with entities within the community, including, at a minimum, the entities specified in section 26.5-2-103 (2)(c), to implement the community plan, which may include subcontracting or partnering with or otherwise delegating responsibility to one or more public or private entities. The local coordinating organization remains responsible to the department for implementing the community plan, meeting the goals specified in the community plan and the coordinator agreement, and meeting any additional requirements imposed by this part 1, by part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5 concerning the Colorado universal preschool program, by department rule, or by the coordinator agreement.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 586, § 3, effective April 25.

26.5-2-105. Department duties - coordinator agreements - review.

To support and provide oversight for the statewide system of local coordinating organizations, the department shall:

Select entities to serve as local coordinating organizations in communities throughout the state as provided in section 26.5-2-103;

Enter into a coordinator agreement with each local coordinating organization that is partially based on the community plan and that specifies the respective duties of the local coordinating organization and the department in implementing the community plan and in meeting the requirements specified in this part 1, in part 2 of article 4 of this title 26.5 concerning the Colorado universal preschool program, and in department rule. The coordinator agreements are not subject to the requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24. The term of the initial coordinator agreement for a local coordinating organization is three years, and subsequent coordinator agreements must have terms of at least three but not more than five years, as determined by the department. The coordinator agreement, at a minimum, must include:

Expectations, targets, and benchmarks, in alignment with statewide goals for the provision of early childhood and family support programs and services in Colorado, that the local coordinating organization is expected to meet in implementing the community plan and how the department and the local coordinating organization will measure success in meeting the expectations, targets, and benchmarks;

If the local coordinating organization is a preschool provider, expectations that the local coordinating organization must meet in ensuring the availability of a mixed delivery system within the community that supports equitable parent choice and in ensuring that the organization is not unfairly advantaged in allocating funding among preschool providers based on parent choice;

Expectations that the local coordinating organization must meet with regard to coordinating with entities within the community, including the entities specified in section 26.5-2-103 (2)(c);

The amount of administrative costs that the local coordinating organization receives from the department and other identified sources during the term of the coordinator agreement; and

The manner in which the local coordinating organization will provide accountability and transparency concerning the amount and payment of administrative expenses and, if the local coordinating organization is distributing or administering public money, the distribution and use of the public money.

Review and approve the community plan created by each local coordinating organization, including revisions of the community plan, as provided in section 26.5-2-104 (1). Before approving a community plan, the department may return the plan to the local coordinating organization with changes to ensure the community plan is feasible, meets the requirements specified in section 26.5-2-104 (1), and is aligned with the statewide goals for the provision of early childhood and family support programs and services in Colorado.

Distribute and administer public funding for early childhood and family support programs and services in accordance with community plans and in coordination with local and tribal agencies, when applicable; except that the department may delegate all or a portion of the responsibility for distributing and administering public funding to a local coordinating organization through the organization's coordinator agreement;

Support local coordinating organizations by providing funding, training and technical assistance, which may be provided online, and, upon request, collaborative support and assistance in implementing the community plans. The department shall prioritize communities, including rural communities, that lack funding and capacity to receive the funding and supports described in this subsection (1)(e).

Review the operations of each local coordinating organization, including the local coordinating organization's compliance with the coordinator agreement and implementation of the community plan, as provided in subsection (3) of this section; and

Identify successful strategies and innovations implemented by local coordinating organizations throughout the state and provide information, including by posting information on the department website, to assist local coordinating organizations in replicating and adapting the strategies and innovations in their communities.

Notwithstanding the requirements imposed on local coordinating organizations pursuant to section 26.5-2-104 (2), if necessary to enable an organization to develop its capacity to serve as a local coordinating organization, the department may specify in the organization's coordinator agreement the degree to which the organization must meet the requirements specified in section 26.5-2-104 (2), with the expectation that the organization must fully meet the requirements within a reasonable time, as determined by the department.

The department shall implement a review process established in department rule by which the department at least annually reviews the performance of each local coordinating organization in serving its community, including implementing the approved community plan; fulfilling the duties specified in section 26.5-2-104, including providing a mixed delivery system of preschool providers; and complying with the coordinator agreement. In implementing the review process, the department shall, at a minimum:

Collaborate with the local coordinating organization to establish in the coordinator agreement expectations, targets, and benchmarks for implementing the approved community plan to ensure the plan is implemented with fidelity and the local coordinating organization is making progress toward achieving the statewide goals for the provision of early childhood and family support programs and services set by the department;

Measure the local coordinating organization's attainment of the expectations, targets, and benchmarks and recommend improvements and changes, including revisions to the community plan, as appropriate, to assist the local coordinating organization in improving performance;

Ensure that the local coordinating organization is complying with the requirements specified in the coordinator agreement and with statutory and regulatory requirements and department guidelines, including requirements and guidelines concerning distribution and administration of funding, if the local coordinating organization is responsible for distributing and administering funding, and data collection and sharing, in implementing the approved community plan and overseeing and coordinating early childhood and family support programs within the community; and

Solicit input from families, providers, members of the early childhood workforce, local and tribal agencies, local governments, the entities specified in section 26.5-2-103 (2)(c), and other interested persons within the community concerning the performance of the local coordinating organization.

If the department at any time determines that the local coordinating organization is not meeting the requirements of the coordinator agreement or is not performing at the level required to successfully implement the community plan and to ensure that the community substantially meets local and statewide goals for the provision of early childhood and family support programs and services, the department may terminate the local coordinating organization's coordinator agreement and implement the application process for selecting a new local coordinating organization for the community as provided in section 26.5-2-103.

The department and a local coordinating organization may, at any time, amend the coordinator agreement or the community plan to change the role of the local coordinating organization or other aspects of the oversight of early childhood and family support programs and services within the community.

For any area within the state for which a local coordinating organization is not selected or for which the local coordinating organization is not fully capable of implementing all aspects of the community plan, the department shall work with the local coordinating organization, if any, and the families, providers, local governments, and local and tribal agencies in the area, as necessary, to oversee and coordinate the availability and provision of early childhood and family support programs and services within the area until such time as a local coordinating organization is selected or is deemed capable of implementing all aspects of the community plan. At a minimum, the department shall:

Assist families in applying for early childhood and family support programs and services and in enrolling children with early care and education providers;

Ensure, to the extent practicable, that an equitable mixed delivery system of preschool providers is available within the area, which may include contracting with providers for the delivery of preschool services;

Combine and coordinate child care resources and funding, in coordination with local and tribal agencies, in order to create a full day of services for as many children as possible; and

Allocate, distribute, and administer state funding and coordinate with local and tribal agencies and local governments to allocate, combine, and distribute local funding for early childhood and family support programs and services within the area.

The department may enter into an agreement with the local coordinating organization for another community to assist in fulfilling the duties described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.

In an area identified pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, the department shall provide training, assistance, and funding to entities in the area, which may include local and tribal agencies, local governments, and nonprofit organizations, to develop the capacity for one or more of the entities to serve as the local coordinating organization for the area. As soon as practicable, the department shall solicit applications as provided in section 26.5-2-103 for an entity to serve as the local coordinating organization for the area.

The executive director shall establish by rule a process by which an applying entity that is not selected to act as a local coordinating organization, or a local coordinating organization for which the coordinating agreement is terminated, may appeal the decision of the department.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 590, § 3, effective April 25.